California, session 20252026, SB544.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1201.2 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:1201.2. An application for a railroad crossing submitted pursuant to Sections 1201 to 1205, inclusive, shall, at a minimum, include all of the following information:(a) A description of the location of the proposed crossing and plans of suitable scale that show all of the features of the crossing, including, but not limited to, streets, roads, tracks, and safety devices, and the location of any buildings, structures, or obstructions in the vicinity of the proposed crossing.(b) A map of suitable scale (1,000 to 3,000 feet per inch) showing the relation of the proposed crossing to existing roads and railroads in the general vicinity of the proposed crossing.(c) A profile showing the ground line and grade line and rate of grades of approach on all highways and railroads affected by the proposed crossing.(d) A copy of the franchise or permit that allows the railroad to cross the public road, highway, or street involved, if so required, from the authority having jurisdiction.(e) Any applicable safety and regulatory measures required pursuant to Section 309.7, Section 778, Sections 1201 to 1205, inclusive, or Section 99152, and any other information the commission may require.SEC. 2. Section 1205.5 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:1205.5. (a) The commission, upon initiating a ratesetting proceeding, shall determine whether the proceeding is an exempt railroad crossing application. If the application is deemed an exempt railroad crossing application, the commission shall issue a proposed resolution with an expedited review and approval process pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c).(b) Before exempting any applications pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall adopt an expedited review and approval process for exempt railroad crossing applications at a voting meeting after considering input from stakeholders and other public comments.(c) The process adopted by the commission pursuant to subdivision (b) shall, at minimum, require public notice of the application and service of the application to relevant stakeholders, including, but not limited to, railroads, rail transit agencies, and local authorities, including county and regional transportation authorities. The resolution of an exempt railroad crossing application shall be publicly noticed on the commission’s voting agenda and be subject to public comment.(d) For purposes of this section, “exempt railroad crossing application” means a railroad application submitted pursuant to Sections 1201 to 1205, inclusive, with clear public benefit, without valid protest objecting, in whole or in part, to the application, and where the commission determines there is no need for an evidentiary hearing or a more comprehensive review.SEC. 3. Section 1701.1 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:1701.1. (a) The commission shall determine whether each proceeding is a quasi-legislative, an adjudication, a ratesetting, or a catastrophic wildfire proceeding. The commission’s decision as to the nature of the proceeding shall be subject to a request for rehearing within 10 days of the date of that decision or of any subsequent ruling that expands the scope of the proceeding. Only those parties who have requested a rehearing within that time period shall subsequently have standing for judicial review and that review shall only be available at the conclusion of the proceeding. The commission shall render its decision regarding the rehearing within 30 days. The commission shall establish rules regarding ex parte communication on case categorization issues.(b) (1) The commission, upon initiating an adjudication proceeding or ratesetting proceeding, shall assign one or more commissioners to oversee the case and an administrative law judge when appropriate. The assigned commissioner shall schedule a prehearing conference and shall prepare and issue by order or ruling a scoping memo that describes the issues to be considered and the applicable timetable for resolution and that, consistent with due process, public policy, and statutory requirements, determines whether the proceeding requires a hearing.(2) The administrative law judge shall either preside over and conduct, or assist the assigned commissioner or commissioners in presiding over and conducting, any evidentiary or adjudication hearing that may be required.(3) This subdivision shall not apply to exempt railroad crossing applications subject to Section 1205.5.(c) The commission, upon initiating a quasi-legislative proceeding, shall assign one or more commissioners to oversee the case and an administrative law judge, when appropriate, who may be assisted by a technical advisory staff member in conducting the proceeding. The assigned commissioner shall prepare and issue by order or ruling a scoping memo that describes the issues to be considered and the applicable timetable for resolution and that, consistent with due process, public policy, and statutory requirements, determines whether the proceeding requires a hearing.(d) (1) Quasi-legislative cases, for purposes of this article, are cases that establish policy, including, but not limited to, rulemakings and investigations that may establish rules affecting an entire industry.(2) Adjudication cases, for purposes of this article, are enforcement cases and complaints except those challenging the reasonableness of any rates or charges as specified in Section 1702.(3) Ratesetting cases, for purposes of this article, are cases in which rates are established for a specific company, including, but not limited to, general rate cases, performance-based ratemaking, and other ratesetting mechanisms.(4) Catastrophic wildfire proceedings, for purposes of this article, are proceedings in which an electrical corporation files an application to recover costs and expenses pursuant to Section 451 or 451.1, as applicable, related to a covered wildfire, as defined in Section 1701.8.(e) (1) (A) “Ex parte communication,” for purposes of this article, means any oral or written communication between a decisionmaker and an interested person concerning any matter before the commission that the commission has not specified in its Rules of Practice and Procedure as being a procedural matter and that does not occur in a public hearing, workshop, or other public proceeding, or on the official record of the proceeding on the matter. The commission shall specify in its Rules of Practice and Procedure, enacted by rulemaking, the types of issues considered procedural matters under this article.(B) “Interested person,” for purposes of this article, means any of the following:(i) Any applicant, an agent or an employee of the applicant, or a person receiving consideration for representing the applicant, or a participant in the proceeding on any matter before the commission.(ii) Any person with a financial interest, as described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 87100) of Chapter 7 of Title 9 of the Government Code, in a matter before the commission, an agent or employee of the person with a financial interest, or a person receiving consideration for representing the person with a financial interest. A person involved in issuing credit ratings or advising entities or persons who invest in the shares or operations of any party to a proceeding is a person with a financial interest.(iii) A representative acting on behalf of any civic, environmental, neighborhood, business, labor, trade, or similar organization who intends to influence the decision of a commission member on a matter before the commission.(iv) Other categories of individuals deemed by the commission, by rule, to be an interested person.(2) The commission shall by rule adopt and publish a definition of decisionmakers and interested persons for purposes of this article, along with any requirements for written reporting of ex parte communications and appropriate sanctions for noncompliance with any rule proscribing ex parte communications. The definition of decisionmakers shall include, but is not limited to: each commissioner; the personal staff of a commissioner if the staff is acting in a policy or legal advisory capacity; the chief administrative law judge of the commission; and the administrative law judge assigned to the proceeding. The commission shall, by rule, explicitly ban both of the following:(A) The practice of one-way ex parte communications from a decisionmaker to an interested person.(B) Any communication between an interested person and a decisionmaker regarding which commissioner or administrative law judge may be assigned to a matter before the commission.(3) For adjudication cases, the rules shall provide that ex parte communications shall be prohibited, as required by this article. The rules shall provide that if an ex parte communication occurs that is prohibited by this article, or if an ex parte communication occurs in a ratesetting case or catastrophic wildfire proceeding, whether initiated by a decisionmaker or an interested person, all of the following shall be required:(A) The interested person shall report the communication within three working days of the communication by filing a notice with the commission that includes all the following:(i) The date, time, and location of the communication, whether the communication was oral or written, or a combination of both, and the communication medium used.(ii) The identity of the decisionmaker, the identity of the person initiating the communication, and the identities of any other persons present.(iii) The topic of the communication, including applicable proceeding numbers.(iv) A substantive description of the interested person’s communication and its content.(v) A copy of any written material or text used during the communication.(B) Any decisionmaker who participated in the communication shall promptly log the ex parte communication by filing a notice that includes all the following:(i) The date, time, and location of the communication, whether the communication was oral or written, or a combination of both, and the communication medium used.(ii) The identity of the interested person, the identity of the person initiating the communication, and the identities of any other persons present.(iii) The topic of the communication, including any applicable proceeding numbers.(iv) A brief description of the communication.(C) If the interested person who participated in the communication has not timely submitted the notice required by subparagraph (A), the decisionmaker shall refer the matter to the attorney for the commission, and an assigned commissioner, by ruling, shall order the interested person to submit the required notice. The interested person shall be subject to any applicable penalties for the initial violation and, if the interested person does not submit the required notice within the time period specified in the assigned commissioner’s ruling, the interested person shall be subject to continuing violations pursuant to Section 2108.(4) The requirements of paragraph (3) shall not apply to any oral ex parte communication occurring at a meeting if all parties are invited to participate and given not less than three working days’ notice.(5) The commission shall not take any vote on a matter in which a notice of a prohibited ex parte communication has been filed pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (3) until all parties to the proceeding have been provided a reasonable opportunity to respond to the communication.(6) If an ex parte communication is not disclosed as required by this subdivision until after the commission has issued a decision on the matter to which the communication pertained, a party not participating in the communication may file a petition to rescind or modify the decision. The party may seek a finding that the ex parte communication significantly influenced the decision’s process or outcome as part of any petition to rescind or modify the decision. The commission shall process the petition in accordance with the commission’s procedures for petitions for modification and shall issue a decision on the petition no later than 180 days after the filing of the petition.(7) (A) Ex parte communications that occur at conferences and that are within the scope of an adjudication, ratesetting, or catastrophic wildfire proceeding shall be subject to the requirements of this article.(B) Ex parte communications that occur at conferences and that are within the scope of a quasi-legislative proceeding shall be governed by the ex parte communication disclosure requirements developed by the commission.(C) For purposes of this section, “ex parte communications that occur at conferences” includes, but is not limited to, communications in a private setting or during meals, entertainment events, and tours, and informal discussions among conference attendees.(8) The commission shall render its decisions based on the law and on the evidence in the record. Ex parte communications shall not be a part of the evidentiary record of the proceedings.(f) The commission may meet in a closed session to discuss administrative matters so long as no collective consensus is reached or vote taken on any matter requiring a vote of the commissioners. The commission shall, by rule, adopt and publish a definition of “administrative matters” for purposes of this section.(g) The commission shall permit written comments received from the public to be included in the record of its proceedings, but the comments shall not be treated as evidence. The commission shall provide parties to the proceeding a reasonable opportunity to respond to any public comments included in the record of proceedings.(h) It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission, and any entity or person seeking to influence actions taken by the commission, shall be subject to all applicable ethical standards, including any applicable obligations under the Political Reform Act of 1974 (Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000) of the Government Code), including, but not limited to, any applicable lobbying obligations.